Mississippi, session 2026, HB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Mississippi Skill Standards Board is created as an advisory board to the Governor, the Legislature and the state workforce development system for the development of a statewide system of industry-defined, industry-recognized skill standards and credentials for all major skilled occupations that: (a)  Provide strong employment and earnings opportunities in the state; (b)  Are nationally recognized; and (c)  Require less than a baccalaureate degree. (2)  The Mississippi Skill Standards Board, hereinafter referred to as the "board," is composed of thirteen (13) members appointed by the Governor.  The term of each board member shall run concurrently with the term of the Governor.  The board consists of the following members: (a)  Eight (8) members representing business, two (2) of whom must be from business entities that employ fewer than fifty (50) employees and one (1) each from the four-sector clusters as defined by Innovate Mississippi; (b)  Two (2) members representing workers; (c)  One (1) member representing secondary education; (d)  One (1) member representing two-year public postsecondary education; and (e)  One (1) member representing four-year public postsecondary education. (3)  The Governor shall appoint the presiding officer of the board from the members representing business. (4)  The board shall: (a)  Validate nationally established skill standards to guide curriculum development, training, assessment and certification of workforce skills; (b)  Convene industry groups to develop skill standards and certification procedures for industries and occupations in which standards have not been established or adopted and recognize the skill standards and certification procedures; (c)  Review standards developed by other states and nations and enter into agreements for mutual recognition of credentials to enhance portability of skills; (d)  Promote, in collaboration with the secondary and postsecondary entities, the use of standards and credentials among employers; and (e)  Develop a memorandum of understanding by and between the workforce and education entities for the effective development, implementation, operations and outcomes of the skills standards effort. (5)  The board shall meet at the call of the presiding officer as often as necessary to accomplish its work, and the board shall meet a minimum of once each quarter in a fiscal year. (6)  A member of the board is not entitled to compensation for service on the board but is entitled to reimbursement for reasonable mileage and expenses incurred in performing board duties as provided in Section 25-3-41. (7)  The Mississippi Community College Board shall provide staff support for the board as necessary. (8)  The board shall report periodically to the Governor and shall provide annual reports to the Governor, the Legislature and the Mississippi Community College Board. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.